Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-214
Consumer, defined.

Consumer means an actual or prospective purchaser, lessee, or recipient of consumer goods or services bought primarily for use for personal, family, or household purposes.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 76.